Illinois, session 104th, SB3034.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Substance Use Disorder Act is amended by 5changing Section 30-5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 301/30-5)7    Sec. 30-5. Patients' rights established. 8    (a) For purposes of this Section, "patient" means any 9person who is receiving or has received early intervention, 10treatment, or other recovery support services under this Act 11or any category of service licensed as "intervention" under 12this Act.13    (b) No patient shall be deprived of any rights, benefits, 14or privileges guaranteed by law, the Constitution of the 15United States of America, or the Constitution of the State of 16Illinois solely because of his or her status as a patient. 17    (c) Persons who have substance use disorders who are also 18suffering from medical conditions shall not be discriminated 19against in admission or treatment by any hospital that 20receives support in any form supported in whole or in part by 21funds appropriated to any State department or agency. 22    (d) Every patient shall have impartial access to services 23without regard to race, religion, sex, ethnicity, age, sexual   SB3034- 2 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1orientation, gender identity, marital status, or other 2disability. 3    (e) Patients shall be permitted the free exercise of 4religion. 5    (f) Every patient's personal dignity shall be recognized 6in the provision of services, and a patient's personal privacy 7shall be assured and protected within the constraints of his 8or her individual treatment. 9    (g) Treatment services shall be provided in the least 10restrictive environment possible. 11    (h) Each patient receiving treatment services shall be 12provided an individual treatment plan, which shall be 13periodically reviewed and updated as mandated by 14administrative rule. 15    (i) Treatment shall be person-centered, meaning that every 16patient shall be permitted to participate in the planning of 17his or her total care and medical treatment to the extent that 18his or her condition permits. 19    (j) A person shall not be denied treatment solely because 20he or she has withdrawn from treatment against medical advice 21on a prior occasion or had prior treatment episodes.22    (k) The patient in residential treatment shall be 23permitted visits by family and significant others, unless such 24visits are clinically contraindicated. 25    (l) A patient in residential treatment shall be allowed to 26conduct private telephone conversations with family and   SB3034- 3 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1friends unless clinically contraindicated.2    (m) A patient in residential treatment shall be permitted 3to send and receive mail without hindrance, unless clinically 4contraindicated. 5    (n) A patient shall be permitted to manage his or her own 6financial affairs unless the patient or the patient's 7guardian, or if the patient is a minor, the patient's parent, 8authorizes another competent person to do so. 9    (o) A patient shall be permitted to request the opinion of 10a consultant at his or her own expense, or to request an 11in-house review of a treatment plan, as provided in the 12specific procedures of the provider. A treatment provider is 13not liable for the negligence of any consultant.14    (p) Unless otherwise prohibited by State or federal law, 15every patient shall be permitted to obtain from his or her own 16physician, the treatment provider, or the treatment provider's 17consulting physician complete and current information 18concerning the nature of care, procedures, and treatment that 19he or she will receive. 20    (q) A patient shall be permitted to refuse to participate 21in any experimental research or medical procedure without 22compromising his or her access to other, non-experimental 23services. Before a patient is placed in an experimental 24research or medical procedure, the provider must first obtain 25his or her informed written consent or otherwise comply with 26the federal requirements regarding the protection of human   SB3034- 4 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1subjects contained in 45 CFR Part 46.2    (r) All medical treatment and procedures shall be 3administered as ordered by a physician and in accordance with 4all Department rules.5    (s) Every patient in treatment shall be permitted to 6refuse medical treatment and to know the consequences of such 7action. Such refusal by a patient shall free the treatment 8licensee from the obligation to provide the treatment. 9    (t) Unless otherwise prohibited by State or federal law, 10every patient, patient's guardian, or parent, if the patient 11is a minor, shall be permitted to inspect and copy all clinical 12and other records kept by the intervention or treatment 13licensee or by his or her physician concerning his or her care 14and maintenance. The licensee or physician may charge a 15reasonable fee for the duplication of a record.16    (u) No owner, licensee, administrator, employee, or agent 17of a licensed intervention or treatment program shall abuse or 18neglect a patient. It is the duty of any individual who becomes 19aware of such abuse or neglect to report it to the Department 20immediately.21    (v) The licensee may refuse access to any person if the 22actions of that person are or could be injurious to the health 23and safety of a patient or the licensee, or if the person seeks 24access for commercial purposes.25    (w) All patients admitted to community-based treatment 26facilities shall be considered voluntary treatment patients   SB3034- 5 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1and such patients shall not be contained within a locked 2setting. 3    (x) Patients and their families or legal guardians shall 4have the right to present complaints to the provider or the 5Department concerning the quality of care provided to the 6patient, without threat of discharge or reprisal in any form 7or manner whatsoever. The complaint process and procedure 8shall be adopted by the Department by rule. The treatment 9provider shall have in place a mechanism for receiving and 10responding to such complaints, and shall inform the patient 11and the patient's family or legal guardian of this mechanism 12and how to use it. The provider shall analyze any complaint 13received and, when indicated, take appropriate corrective 14action. Every patient and his or her family member or legal 15guardian who makes a complaint shall receive a timely response 16from the provider that substantively addresses the complaint. 17The provider shall inform the patient and the patient's family 18or legal guardian about other sources of assistance if the 19provider has not resolved the complaint to the satisfaction of 20the patient or the patient's family or legal guardian. 21    (y) A patient may refuse to perform labor at a program 22unless such labor is a part of the patient's individual 23treatment plan as documented in the patient's clinical record.24    (z) A person who is in need of services may apply for 25voluntary admission in the manner and with the rights provided 26for under regulations promulgated by the Department. If a   SB3034- 6 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1person is refused admission, then staff, subject to rules 2promulgated by the Department, shall refer the person to 3another facility or to other appropriate services. 4    (aa) No patient shall be denied services based solely on 5HIV status. Further, records and information governed by the 6AIDS Confidentiality Act and the AIDS Confidentiality and 7Testing Code (77 Ill. Adm. Code 697) shall be maintained in 8accordance therewith.9    (bb) Records of the identity, diagnosis, prognosis or 10treatment of any patient maintained in connection with the 11performance of any service or activity relating to substance 12use disorder education, early intervention, intervention, 13training, or treatment that is regulated, authorized, or 14directly or indirectly assisted by any Department or agency of 15this State or under any provision of this Act shall be 16confidential and may be disclosed only in accordance with the 17provisions of federal law and regulations concerning the 18confidentiality of substance use disorder patient records as 19contained in 42 U.S.C. Sections 290dd-2 and 42 CFR Part 2, or 20any successor federal statute or regulation.21        (1) The following are exempt from the confidentiality 22    protections set forth in 42 CFR Section 2.12(c):23            (A) Veteran's Administration records.24            (B) Information obtained by the Armed Forces.25            (C) Information given to qualified service 26        organizations.  SB3034- 7 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1            (D) Communications within a program or between a 2        program and an entity having direct administrative 3        control over that program.4            (E) Information given to law enforcement personnel 5        investigating a patient's commission of a crime on the 6        program premises or against program personnel.7            (F) Reports under State law of incidents of 8        suspected child abuse and neglect; however, 9        confidentiality restrictions continue to apply to the 10        records and any follow-up information for disclosure 11        and use in civil or criminal proceedings arising from 12        the report of suspected abuse or neglect.13        (2) If the information is not exempt, a disclosure can 14    be made only under the following circumstances:15            (A) With patient consent as set forth in 42 CFR 16        Sections 2.1(b)(1) and 2.31, and as consistent with 17        pertinent State law.18            (B) For medical emergencies as set forth in 42 CFR 19        Sections 2.1(b)(2) and 2.51.20            (C) For research activities as set forth in 42 CFR 21        Sections 2.1(b)(2) and 2.52 and the Domestic Violence 22        Fatality Review Act.23            (D) For audit evaluation activities as set forth 24        in 42 CFR Section 2.53.25            (E) With a court order as set forth in 42 CFR 26        Sections 2.61 through 2.67.  SB3034- 8 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1        (3) The restrictions on disclosure and use of patient 2    information apply whether the holder of the information 3    already has it, has other means of obtaining it, is a law 4    enforcement or other official, has obtained a subpoena, or 5    asserts any other justification for a disclosure or use 6    that is not permitted by 42 CFR Part 2. Any court orders 7    authorizing disclosure of patient records under this Act 8    must comply with the procedures and criteria set forth in 9    42 CFR Sections 2.64 and 2.65. Except as authorized by a 10    court order granted under this Section, no record referred 11    to in this Section may be used to initiate or substantiate 12    any charges against a patient or to conduct any 13    investigation of a patient.14        (4) The prohibitions of this subsection shall apply to 15    records concerning any person who has been a patient, 16    regardless of whether or when the person ceases to be a 17    patient.18        (5) Any person who discloses the content of any record 19    referred to in this Section except as authorized shall, 20    upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.21        (6) The Department shall prescribe regulations to 22    carry out the purposes of this subsection. These 23    regulations may contain such definitions, and may provide 24    for such safeguards and procedures, including procedures 25    and criteria for the issuance and scope of court orders, 26    as in the judgment of the Department are necessary or   SB3034- 9 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1    proper to effectuate the purposes of this Section, to 2    prevent circumvention or evasion thereof, or to facilitate 3    compliance therewith. 4    (cc) Each patient shall be given a written explanation of 5all the rights enumerated in this Section and a copy, signed by 6the patient, shall be kept in every patient record. If a 7patient is unable to read such written explanation, it shall 8be read to the patient in a language that the patient 9understands. A copy of all the rights enumerated in this 10Section shall be posted in a conspicuous place within the 11program where it may readily be seen and read by program 12patients and visitors. 13    (dd) The program shall ensure that its staff is familiar 14with and observes the rights and responsibilities enumerated 15in this Section.16    (ee) Licensed organizations shall comply with the right of 17any adolescent to consent to treatment without approval of the 18parent or legal guardian in accordance with the Consent by 19Minors to Health Care Services Act. 20    (ff) At the point of admission for services, licensed 21organizations must obtain written informed consent, as defined 22in Section 1-10 and in administrative rule, from each client, 23patient, or legal guardian. 24(Source: P.A. 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 25    Section 10. The Mental Health and Developmental   SB3034- 10 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1Disabilities Confidentiality Act is amended by changing 2Section 7 as follows: 3    (740 ILCS 110/7)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 807)4    Sec. 7. Review of therapist or agency; use of recipient's 5record. 6    (a) When a therapist or agency which provides services is 7being reviewed for purposes of licensure, statistical 8compilation, research, evaluation, or other similar purpose, a 9recipient's record may be used by the person conducting the 10review to the extent that this is necessary to accomplish the 11purpose of the review, provided that personally identifiable 12data is removed from the record before use. Personally 13identifiable data may be disclosed only in accordance with 14Section 5 of this Act. Licensure and the like may not be 15withheld or withdrawn for failure to disclose personally 16identifiable data if consent is not obtained.17    (b) When an agency which provides services is being 18reviewed for purposes of funding, accreditation, reimbursement 19or audit by a State or federal agency or accrediting body, a 20recipient's record may be used by the person conducting the 21review and personally identifiable information may be 22disclosed without consent, provided that the personally 23identifiable information is necessary to accomplish the 24purpose of the review.25    For the purpose of this subsection, an inspection   SB3034- 11 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1investigation or site visit by the United States Department of 2Justice regarding compliance with a pending consent decree is 3considered an audit by a federal agency.4    (c) An independent team of experts under Brian's Law shall 5be entitled to inspect and copy the records of any recipient 6whose death is being examined by such a team pursuant to the 7mortality review process authorized by Brian's Law. 8Information disclosed under this subsection may not be 9redisclosed without the written consent of one of the persons 10identified in Section 4 of this Act.11    (d) Staff and any designee of the Illinois Criminal 12Justice Information Authority, members of the Ad Hoc Statewide 13Domestic Violence Fatality Review Committee of the Illinois 14Criminal Justice Information Authority Board, and the regional 15domestic violence fatality review teams are entitled to 16receive, inspect, copy, and share the records covered by this 17Act of any recipient subject to a domestic violence fatality 18review, including, but not limited to, a recipient who 19experienced or caused a near-fatality or fatality related to 20domestic violence, for the purposes of domestic violence 21fatality review and in accordance with the responsibilities 22required and authorized by the Domestic Violence Fatality 23Review Act. Information disclosed under this Section is 24subject to the confidentiality requirements of the Domestic 25Violence Fatality Review Act. 26(Source: P.A. 98-378, eff. 8-16-13.)   SB3034- 12 -LRB104 17922 JRC 31358 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.